Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 2. Operation of Vehicles Generally
Wyoming's driving while under the influence enhancement provision does not restrict qualifying convictions to offenses that arise from violations of laws that are identical, or even substantially similar, to Wyoming's definition of driving while under the influence. The plain language of Wyoming's enhancement statute, in omitting any reference to the degree of intoxication required under another state's statute, does not limit qualifying convictions to those that arise under statutes which prohibit driving while under the influence in exactly the same fashion and to the same degree that Wyoming does.
Spreeman v. State, 2012 WY 88, 278 P.3d 1159,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2012).

Defendant's Michigan conviction for driving while visibly impaired under MCLS 257.625(3) could be used to enhance her Wyoming conviction for driving while under the influence (DWUI) to a felony, because Wyoming's enhancement statute omitted any reference to the degree of intoxication required under another state's statute and contained no requirement that a conviction for DWUI had to be received under a statute that was substantially similar.
Spreeman v. State, 2012 WY 88, 278 P.3d 1159,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2012).

Sentencing. —

Definitive event constituting a conviction may be any one of the events described in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-102(a)(xi) (A-E). The statute provides fair warning to those who violate the driving while intoxicated or impaired statutes that such is the case.
Robison v. State, 2011 WY 4, 246 P.3d 259,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2011).

Definitive event constituting a conviction may be any one of the events described in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-102(a)(xi) (A-E). The statute provides fair warning to those who violate the driving while intoxicated or impaired statutes that such is the case.
Robison v. State, 2011 WY 4, 246 P.3d 259,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2011).

While a 365-day sentence was clearly illegal as the maximum for defendant's third driving under the influence conviction was six months under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-233(e), defendant had not yet served six months, the legal portion of his sentence, when he allegedly escaped. Thus, the prosecution on an escape charge under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-206(a)(ii)(A) was acceptable.
Crosby v. State, 2011 WY 44, 247 P.3d 876,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2011).

Prior conviction
was properly used for felony enhancement purposes, as the trial judge's
plea colloquy for the prior conviction met the plea advisement requirements
of W. Va. R. Crim. P. 11(b), including defendant's acknowledgement
that he was not promised anything or coerced into pleading guilty,
and defendant signed a statement of his constitutional rights, which,
among other things, advised him of the right to counsel. Derrera v. State, 2014 WY 77, 327 P.3d 107,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2014).

Double jeopardy. —

Driver's license suspensions under §

31-6-102

do not constitute punishment for purposes of double jeopardy, but are civil proceedings, separate and distinct from prosecutions for driving while under the influence. Glasrud v. City of Laramie, 934 P.2d 1242,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1997).

Death caused by driving vehicle while so intoxicated driver incapable of driving safely. —

See Felske v. State, 706 P.2d 257,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 558

(Wyo. 1985) (prosecution for aggravated vehicular homicide).

No jury trial right with respect to prior misdemeanor convictions. —

The Wyoming habitual criminal statutes do not by their terms encompass misdemeanor convictions for driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor. With respect to such sentence enhancement proceedings under the state statute or a similar city ordinance, unless the statutory language so requires, a right to a jury trial with respect to the existence of prior convictions does not exist. Jaramillo v. Green River, 719 P.2d 655,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 560

(Wyo. 1986).

Conditions under which suspension of imprisonment allowed. —

The plain language of subsection (e) allows suspension of imprisonment conditioned upon the defendant voluntarily completing an alcohol education or treatment program, for either first time or subsequent convictions. Norman v. State, 747 P.2d 520,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 563

(Wyo. 1987), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. Jan. 12, 1988).

Sheriff could have owed a duty to have arrested intoxicated driver. —

Trial court erred in dismissing a wrongful death action brought by mother against sheriff and county, on behalf of her son who was killed by an intoxicated driver; after determining that the intoxicated driver immediately intended to drive to follow an ambulance to the hospital to be with an injured friend, the sheriff had a duty to do what an ordinarily prudent law enforcement officer would have done under like circumstances.
Becker v. Mason, 2006 WY 143, 145 P.3d 1268,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2006).

Trial court imposed an illegal sentence when it sentenced defendant to two six-month terms of incarceration on two DUI counts; because the statute described alternative means of committing the offense, the court should have entered only one conviction and sentence for DUI under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-5-233(b). Stalcup v. State, 2013 WY 114, 311 P.3d 104,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2013).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction.—

State’s evidence sufficiently supported its charge that defendant drove under the influence of alcohol (fourth or subsequent offense within ten years). The jury could have reasonably inferred that the evidence established defendant drank before he ran out of gas and pulled to the side of the road and that his blood alcohol content exceeded 0.08% at that time. Hyatt v. State, 2018 WY 84, 422 P.3d 524,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2018).

Applied

in

House v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 66 Wyo. 1, 203 P.2d 962,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1949); Michelsen v. Gilbert, 449 P.2d 795,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1969); State v. Heberling, 553 P.2d 1043,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1976); Norwood v. City of Sheridan, 593 P.2d 184,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1979); Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980); Taylor v. State, 658 P.2d 1297,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 287

(Wyo. 1983); Volz v. State, 707 P.2d 179,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 581

(Wyo. 1985); Gomez v. State, 718 P.2d 53,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 542

(Wyo. 1986); Keehn ex rel. Keehn v. Town of Torrington, 834 P.2d 112,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1992); Glazier v. State, 843 P.2d 1200,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1992); Stowe v. State, 2014 WY 97,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Aug 1, 2014).

Quoted

in

State v. Cantrell, 64 Wyo. 132, 186 P.2d 539,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1947); Caton v. State, 709 P.2d 1260,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 621

(Wyo. 1985); City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987); Gerstell v. State ex rel. Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 769 P.2d 389,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 1989); Whitfield v. State, 781 P.2d 913,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1989); Mascarenas v. State, 2013 WY 163, 315 P.3d 656,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 169

, 2013 WL 6858581 (Dec 31, 2013); Marshall v. State, 2014 WY 168,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Dec. 23, 2014).

Stated

in

State v. Sodergren, 686 P.2d 521,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1984); Small v. State, 689 P.2d 420,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1984); Bell v. State, 693 P.2d 769,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 425

(Wyo. 1985); Wheeler v. State, 705 P.2d 861,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 557

(Wyo. 1985); Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Hamilton, 743 P.2d 877,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 517

(Wyo. 1987); Drake v. State ex rel. Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 751 P.2d 1319,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1988); Hooten v. State, Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 751 P.2d 1323,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Tavegia v. Bromley, 67 Wyo. 93, 214 P.2d 975,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1950); Johnson v. State, 532 P.2d 598,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1975); Thomas v. State, 562 P.2d 1287,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 249

(Wyo. 1977); Stanton v. State, 692 P.2d 947,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1984); Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990); Wilson v. State ex rel. Office of Hearing Exmr., 841 P.2d 90,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1992); Wylie v. Wyoming DOT, 970 P.2d 395,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1998); Farmer v. State, Dep't of Transp., 986 P.2d 165,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1999); Jones v. State, 2002 WY 35, 41 P.3d 1247,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2002); Wheaton v. State, 2003 WY 56, 68 P.3d 1167,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2003); Whitney v. State, 2004 WY 118, 99 P.3d 457,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(2004); Peterson v. Wyo. DOT, 2007 WY 90, 158 P.3d 706,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 98

; Hittner v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT (In re Hittner), 2008 WY 91, 189 P.3d 872,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Aug. 1, 2008); Kelley v. State, 2009 WY 3, 199 P.3d 521,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Jan. 14, 2009); Endris v. State, 2010 WY 73, 233 P.3d 578,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(June 3, 2010); Harvey v. State, 2011 WY 72, 250 P.3d 167,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Apr. 25, 2011); Dubbelde v. State ex rel. DOT, 2014 WY 63,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(May 15, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Haderlie, 2015 WY 90,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(July 2, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For case note, “Torts — Injuries Arising From Negligence in Furnishing Liquor to Minors and Intoxicated Adults: New Tort Action in Wyoming. McClellan v. Tottenhoff, 666 P.2d 408,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 285 (1984).

For comment, “Filling in the Blanks after Prouse: A New Standard for the Drinking-Driving Roadblock,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 241 (1985).

For comment, “The New Implied Consent Amendments: A Step in the Right Direction,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 165 (1986).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — When Should a Jury Trial Be Required in the Wyoming Municipal Courts? City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 611 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Intoxication of person injured or killed, as affecting applicability of last clear chance doctrine, 26 ALR2d 308.

Admissibility of evidence showing plaintiff's antecedent intemperate habits in personal injury motor vehicle accident action, 46 ALR2d 103.

What is a “motor vehicle” within statutes making it an offense to drive while intoxicated, 66 ALR2d 1146.

Construction and application of statutes creating presumption or other inference of intoxication from specified percentages of alcohol present in system, 16 ALR3d 748.

Right to trial by jury in criminal prosecution for driving while intoxicated or similar offense, 16 ALR3d 1373.

Driving under the influence, or when addicted to the use, of drugs as criminal offense, 17 ALR3d 815.

Liability based on entrusting automobile to one who is intoxicated or known to be excessive user of intoxicants, 19 ALR3d 1175.

Applicability, to operation of motor vehicle on private property, of legislation making drunken driving a criminal offense, 29 ALR3d 938.

Admissibility in criminal case of blood alcohol test where blood was taken from unconscious driver, 72 ALR3d 325.

What amounts to violation of drunken driving statute in officer's “presence” or “view” so as to permit warrantless arrest, 74 ALR3d 1138.

What constitutes driving, operating or being in control of motor vehicle for purposes of driving while intoxicated statute or ordinance, 93 ALR3d 7.

Duty of law enforcement officer to offer suspect chemical sobriety test under implied consent law, 95 ALR3d 710.

Necessity and sufficiency of proof that tests of blood alcohol concentration were conducted in conformance with prescribed methods, 96 ALR3d 745.

Denial of accused's request for initial contact with attorney — drunk driving cases, 18 ALR4th 705.

Destruction of ampoule used in alcohol breath test as warranting suppression of result of test, 19 ALR4th 509.

Failure to restrain drunk driver as ground of liability of state or local government unit or officer, 48 ALR4th 320.

Validity, construction and application of statutes directly proscribing driving with blood-alcohol level in excess of established percentage, 54 ALR4th 149.

Snowmobile operation as DWI or DUI, 56 ALR4th 1092.

Horizontal gaze nystagmus test: use in impaired driving prosecution, 60 ALR4th 1129.

Social host's liability for injuries incurred by third parties as a result of intoxicated guest's negligence, 62 ALR4th 16.

Tort liability of college or university for injury suffered by student as a result of own or fellow student's intoxication, 62 ALR4th 81.

Passenger's liability to vehicular accident victim for harm caused by intoxicated motor vehicle driver, 64 ALR4th 272.

Driving while intoxicated: “choice of evils” defense that driving was necessary to protect life or property, 64 ALR4th 298.

Cough medicine as “intoxicating liquor” under DUI statute, 65 ALR4th 1238.

Horseback riding or operation of horse-drawn vehicle as within drunk driving statute, 71 ALR4th 1129.

Operation of bicycle as within drunk driving statute, 73 ALR4th 1139.

Validity, construction, and application of state or local law prohibiting maintenance of vehicle for purpose of keeping or selling controlled substances, 31 ALR5th 760.

Operation of mopeds and motorized recreational two-, three- and four-wheeled vehicles as within scope of driving while intoxicated statutes, 32 ALR5th 659.

Intoxication of automobile driver as basis for awarding punitive damages, 33 ALR5th 303.

Products liability: recovery for injury or death resulting from intentional inhalation of product's fumes or vapors to produce intoxicating or similar effect, 50 ALR5th 275.

Applicability, to operation of motor vehicle on private property, of legislation making drunken driving a criminal offense, 52 ALR5th 655.

Validity, construction, and application of statute permitting forfeiture of motor vehicle for operating while intoxicated, 89 ALR5th 539.

Vertical gaze nystagmus test: Use in impaired driving prosecution, 117 ALR5th 491.

Admissibility and sufficiency of extrapolation evidence in DUI prosecutions, 119 ALR5th 379.

Assimilation, under Assimilative Crimes Act (18 U.S.C. § 13), of state statutes relating to driving while intoxicated or under influence of alcohol, 175 ALR Fed 293.